Illinois, session 104th, HB4167.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Officer Prohibited Activities Act is 5amended by adding Section 4b as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 105/4b new)7    Sec. 4b. Municipal officials. 8    (a) As used in this Section, "executive official" 9includes, but is not limited to:10        (1) the mayor of a city;11        (2) a member of the board of alderpersons, or similar 12    body, of a city;13        (3) the president of a village or unincorporated town;14        (4) a member of the board of trustees, or similar 15    body, of a village or unincorporated town; or16        (5) a commissioner of a municipality under the 17    commission form of municipal government.18    (b) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory Act 19of the 104th General Assembly, an executive official of a 20municipality may not hold any office or employment with a 21township if there is a contractual relationship or pecuniary 22interest between the municipality and the township during the 23executive official's term of office.